Idaho, session 2025, H0481.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Public Schools Educational Support Program's
Division of Facilities is hereby reduced by $180,822,300 from the School
District Facilities Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. Of the amounts reduced in Section 1 of this act for the Public
Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Facilities, $180,822,300
shall be reduced from the amounts considered expended from the School Dis-
trict Facilities Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.